lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_markedStrongGH.txt
!==================================================
LEXICON NounInflIV
!  for noun roots that end in marked strong -gh (*)
!==================================================

!------------------------------------------|
!               ABSOLUTIVE                 |
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^%{%0%}                PostInflIV; ^[Abs.Pl]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}t           PostInflIV; ^[Abs.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}k             PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ka     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}nka PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gka   PostInflIV;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^put           PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}put      PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gput  PostInflIV;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^pung          PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}pung     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpung PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}n PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten             PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gken  PostInflIV;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^si            PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}si       PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gsi   PostInflIV;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^tek           PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek      PostInflIV; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gtek  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}a      PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}i        PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^kek               PostInflIV;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}at     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}it       PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gket  PostInflIV;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ak     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ik       PostInflIV; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkek  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ni     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}ni       PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^egni              PostInflIV;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^teng          PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}teng     PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^egteng            PostInflIV;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^tek           PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek      PostInflIV; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^egtek             PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}m         PostInflIV; ^[Rel.Pl]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}t         PostInflIV; ^[Rel.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}k               PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^ma            PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^ma            PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gma     PostInflIV;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemta   PostInflIV;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflIV; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtung PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpek    PostInflIV;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesi   PostInflIV;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflIV; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetek  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}an     PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}an     PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenka  PostInflIV;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenka  PostInflIV;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIV; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenka  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mi            PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mi            PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmi     PostInflIV;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeng   PostInflIV;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflIV; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeng   PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------------|
!                  ABLATIVE MODALIS                  |
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^meng                        PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^neng                      PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gneng              PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mneng        PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemneng    PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnneng       PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemnneng   PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng     PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegneng PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng      PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpeneng    PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng     PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpegneng   PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng    PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesineng  PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng   PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegneng PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}aneng        PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}aneng      PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkeneng    PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itneng       PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itneng          PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkeneng PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itneng            PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itneng          PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mineng              PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mineng            PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmineng    PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggneng            PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggneng          PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeggneng  PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megneng             PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megneng           PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegneng   PostInflIV;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteneng           PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteneng         PostInflIV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegteneng PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!             LOCATIVE (localis)               |
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^mi                        PostInflIV; ^[Loc.Pl]:^ni                      PostInflIV; ^[Loc.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gni              PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mni        PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemni    PostInflIV;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnni       PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemnni   PostInflIV;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegni     PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflIV; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegni PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeni      PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpeni    PostInflIV;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegni     PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpegni   PostInflIV;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesini    PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesini  PostInflIV;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni   PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflIV; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegni PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ani        PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ani      PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkeni    PostInflIV;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itni       PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itni          PostInflIV;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkeni PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itni            PostInflIV; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itni          PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mini              PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mini            PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmini    PostInflIV;
